test/src/morphology/N-yed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ед: # Noun 'kettle' - full paradigm /Type 13/
     ед+N+Sg+Nom: ед
     ед+N+Sg+Acc: едмʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen: едʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat: еданʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc: едхана
     ед+N+Sg+Abl: едхад
     ед+N+Sg+Pros: едувна
     ед+N+Du+Nom: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom: едˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Acc: ед
# From хад maybe also хадо or хаду.
     ед+N+Pl+Gen: едˮ 
# From хад maybe also хадоˮ or хадуˮ.
     ед+N+Pl+Dat: едхаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc: едхаˮна
     ед+N+Pl+Abl: едхат
     ед+N+Pl+Pros: едˮмана    
         
     ед+N+Tra: едӈэ
     ед+N+Car: едсиˮ
     ед+N+Equ: еддаремʼ
     ед+N+Equ+Lat: еддаревʼ
     
     ед+N+Lim+Sg+Nom: едри     
     
# Possessive forms 
     
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [едав, едув] 
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: едар
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: едда 
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: едмиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [едриʼ, едариʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: еддиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: едваˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: еддаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: еддоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [едав, едув]  
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: едамд  
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: едамда 
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: едмиʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: едамдиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: едамдиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: едваˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: едмдаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: едмдоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: едан   
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: еданд  
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: еданда 
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: едниʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: едандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: едандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: еднаˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: едндаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: едндоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: едхан   
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: едхани  
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: едханд  
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: едханда 
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: едханиʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: едхандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: едхандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: едханаˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: едхандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: едхандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: едханан   
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: едхананд  
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: едхананда 
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: едхананиʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: едханандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: едханандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: едхананаˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: едханандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: едханандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: едхадан    
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: едхаданд  
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: едхаданда 
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: едхаданиʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: едхадандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: едхадандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: едхаданаˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: едхадандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: едхадандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: едувнан    
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: едувнанд  
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: едувнанда 
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: едувнаниʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: едувнандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: едувнандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: едувнанаˮ 
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: едувнандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: едувнандоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: едхаюн  
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: едхаюд  
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: едхаюда 
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: едхаюн  
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: едхаюд  
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: едхаюда 
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: едхаюн  
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: едхают  
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: едхаюта 
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: едхаютиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: едхаютиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: едхаютаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: едхаютоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: едан   
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: едад   
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [едда, едада]  
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: едниʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: еддиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: еддиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: еднаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: еддаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: еддоʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: едан   
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: едад   
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [едда, едада]  
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: едниʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: еддиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: еддиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: еднаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: еддаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: еддоʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: едаˮн  
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: едат   
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: едта  
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: едˮниʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: едтиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: едтиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: едˮнаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: едтаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: едтоʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: едхаˮн 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: едхаˮнат 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: едхата 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: едхаˮниʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: едхатиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: едхатиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: едхаˮнаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: едхатаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: едхатоʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: едхаˮнан  
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: едхаˮнат  
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: едхаˮната 
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: едхаˮнаниʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: едхаˮнатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: едхаˮнатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: едхаˮнанаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: едхаˮнатаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: едхаˮнатоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: едхатан 
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: едхатат 
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: едхатата 
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: едхатаниʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: едхататиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: едхататиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: едхатанаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: едхататаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: едхататоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: едˮманан  
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: едˮманат  
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: едˮманата 
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: едˮмананиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: едˮманатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: едˮманатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: едˮмананаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: едˮманатаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: едˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     ед+N+Pred+Abs: едад
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: едадав 
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: едадар  
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: едадада 
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: едадав
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: едадамд
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: едадамда
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: едадан
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: едаданд
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: едаданда
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: едадамиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: едадариʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: едададиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: едадамиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: едадамдиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: едадамдиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: едаданиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: едадандиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: едадандиʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: едадаваˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: едадараˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: едададоʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: едадаваˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: едадамдаˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: едадамдоʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: едаданаˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: едадандаˮ
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: едадандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: едадмʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: едан  
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ед
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: еданиʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: едадиʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: едаваˮ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: едадаˮ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: едˮ  
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: едадамзь
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: еданась 
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: едась   
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: еданинзь
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: едадинзь
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едханзь
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: едаваць 
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: едадаць 
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: едаць   
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 

     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едав 
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едар  
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едада 
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едамиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едариʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едадиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едаваˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едараˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: едадоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюн  
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюд  
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюда 
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюниʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едан   
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едад   
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едада  
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: еданиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едадиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едадиʼ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: еданаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едадаˮ 
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: едадоʼ 
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едавась
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едарась
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едадась
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едаминзь
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едаринзь
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едадинзь
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едаваць
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едараць
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: едадонзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюнась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюнинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюнаць
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдаць
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: едхаюдонзь
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: еданась
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадась
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадась
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: еданинзь
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадинзь
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадинзь
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: еданаць
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадаць
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: едадонзь
